Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7004
Applicability of act.

The Health Care Professional Credentialing Verification Act applies to health carriers that offer closed plans or combination plans having a closed component.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 29.